District of Columbia statutes.
3-419

Injunctions.

Whenever the Mayor finds that any person has engaged in, or is about to engage in, the unlawful practice of funeral directing or apprentice funeral directing, the unlawful operation of a funeral services establishment, or any act which constitutes or will constitute a violation of any provision of this chapter or rules and regulations issued pursuant thereto, the Mayor may make application to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for an order enjoining unlawful practice or act. Upon a showing by the Mayor that person has engaged in, or is about to engage in, any unlawful practice or act, an injunction, restraining orders, or other orders as may be appropriate may be granted by the Court without bond.

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 20, 31 DCR 1815
1981 Ed., § 2-2819.
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 3-420, see § 2(c) of the Funeral Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-445, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9209).
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 5-84, see Mayor’s Order 87-186, August 3, 1987.